Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3401
Information, statements, and data; furnish without liability.

Any person, hospital, sanitarium, nursing home, rest home, or other organization may provide information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data relating to the condition and treatment of any person to the Department of Health and Human Services, the Nebraska Medical Association or any of its allied medical societies, the Nebraska Association of Hospitals and Health Systems, any inhospital staff committee, or any joint venture of such entities to be used in the course of any study for the purpose of reducing morbidity or mortality, and no liability of any kind or character for damages or other relief shall arise or be enforced against any person or organization by reason of having provided such information or material, by reason of having released or published the findings and conclusions of such groups to advance medical research and medical education, or by reason of having released or published generally a summary of such studies.

Laws 1961, c. 347, § 1, p. 1105;

Laws 1992, LB 860, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 44;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 646;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 561.